Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.360

Transfer of county sheriff's employees—Purpose.

It is the purpose of RCW 35.13.360 through 35.13.400 to require the lateral transfer of any qualified county sheriff's employee who, by reason of annexation or incorporation of an unincorporated area of a county, will or is likely to be laid off due to sheriff's department cutbacks resulting from the loss of the unincorporated law enforcement responsibility.

[ 1993 c 189 s 2.]